Massachusetts, session 194th, H2338.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 3A of chapter 40A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended in subsection (a) by adding at the end thereof the following: 
No community without a rail, subway, or ferry station shall have to comply with this 
section.